Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 1. General Authority.

Sec. 06.26.010.
Persons authorized to act as fiduciaries.

Notwithstanding other provisions of law and except as provided in AS

06.26.020

, a person may not act as a fiduciary in this state unless the person is

a trust company organized under this chapter;

a private trust company that has received an exemption under AS

06.26.200

;

a state financial institution;

a national bank having its principal office in this state and authorized by the United States Comptroller of the Currency to act as a fiduciary;

a federally chartered savings association having its principal office in this state and authorized by its federal chartering authority to act as a fiduciary;

an international bank that has a branch bank in this state established or maintained under AS

06.05.550

; in this paragraph, “international bank” has the meaning given in AS

06.05.990

;

an interstate national bank with a branch bank in this state established or maintained under AS

06.05.550

; in this paragraph, “interstate national bank” means a national bank whose principal office, as designated in the bank’s articles of incorporation, is not located in this state;

an entity that

is organized under the laws of a state of the United States other than this state;

holds a charter, license, certificate, or other type of authorization from this or another state of the United States to engage in banking; and

has a branch bank located in this state established or maintained under AS 06.05.550;

an interstate state trust company or international trust company with a trust office authorized by the department under AS

06.26.810

—

06.26.895

;

a trustee of only charitable trusts, does not offer fiduciary services to the general public with regard to noncharitable trusts, and observes the requirements applicable to trustees under AS

13.36.225

—

13.36.290

(Alaska Uniform Prudent Investor Act); or

a federally chartered credit union having its principal office in this state and authorized by the National Credit Union Administration to act as a fiduciary.

In this section, “branch bank” has the meaning given in AS

06.05.990

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Sec. 06.26.020.
Exemptions.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a person does not act as a fiduciary under this chapter if the person

is licensed to practice law in this state, the person is acting within the scope of the license, and the person and any law firm of the person are not trustees of more trusts than the number established for the person and law firm by the department by regulation or order; in this paragraph, “law firm” means a partnership, a professional corporation organized under AS 10.45, or another association organized for the practice of law and in which the person practices law;

acts as trustee under a deed of trust delivered only as security for the payment of money or for the performance of another act;

receives and distributes on behalf of a principal rents and proceeds of sales as a real estate broker or other licensee under AS 08.88;

engages in securities business activity as a registered broker-dealer, a broker-dealer agent, an investment adviser, or an investment adviser representative, or as a federal covered investment adviser who has made a notice filing under AS

45.56.360(c)

, the person is acting within the scope of the person’s registration or notice filing, and the activity is regulated by the department under AS 45.56 or by the United States Securities and Exchange Commission; in this paragraph, “agent,” “broker-dealer,” “federal covered investment adviser,” “investment adviser,” “investment adviser representative,” and “securities business” have the meanings given in AS

45.56.900

;

engages in the sale and administration of an insurance product as an insurance company licensed under AS 21 or an insurance producer licensed under AS 21 and is acting within the scope of that license;

handles escrow transactions and is a title insurance company that has a certificate of authority issued under AS 21.09, a title insurance limited producer that is licensed as required by AS

21.66.270

, or an employee of the title insurance company or title insurance producer when acting in the scope of the employee’s employment; in this paragraph,

“escrow transaction” has the meaning given in AS

34.80.090

;

“title insurance company” has the meaning given in AS

21.66.480

;

“title insurance limited producer” has the meaning given in AS

21.66.480

;

is a cemetery association organized and acting under AS 10.30;

is a trustee for a voting trust under AS 10.06 and is acting in that capacity;

has a certified public accountant license issued under AS

08.04.105

or

08.04.195

, the person is acting within the scope of the license, and the person and any accounting firm of the person are not trustees of more trusts than the number established for the person and accounting firm by the department by regulation or order; in this paragraph, “accounting firm” means a partnership, a professional corporation organized under AS 10.45, or another association organized for the practice of public accounting and in which the person practices public accounting;

holds real property in trust for the primary purpose of subdivision, development, or sale or to facilitate a business transaction with respect to the real property;

serves as a trustee of a trust created by the person’s family members;

holds money or other assets as a homeowners’ association or similar organization to pay maintenance and other related costs for commonly owned property; in this paragraph, “homeowners’ association” includes an association of apartment owners under AS

34.07.450

and a unit owners’ association or master association under AS

34.08.990

;

holds money or other assets in connection with the collection of debts or payments on loans by a person acting solely as the agent or representative at the sole direction of the person to whom the debt or payment is owed, including engaging in the business of an escrow agent;

acts as a conservator if the person is appointed by a court of this or another state or is qualified to act as a conservator under AS

13.26.580

;

acts as a personal representative if the person is appointed a personal representative by a court of this or another state or is qualified to act as a personal representative under AS

13.21.035

;

acts as a guardian or receiver if the person is appointed as a guardian or receiver by a court of this or another state;

is a business partner acting with regard to the business, or a co- owner of property acting with regard to the co-owned property;

serves as a trustee of one or more trusts in which the settlor is not a family member of the person, except that the person may not at any one time serve as a trustee for trusts that cumulatively have more than 10 different settlors; however, the department may change by regulation or order the maximum number of settlors allowed for this exemption; in this paragraph, a husband and wife who create a joint trust are considered to be one settlor.

When establishing the number of trusts that are allowed for an exemption under (a)(1) or (9) of this section or when changing the maximum number of settlors that are allowed for an exemption under (a)(18) of this section, the department shall consider the protection of the public, the effect on efficient delivery of trust services at a reasonable cost, and the likelihood that the particular exemption can make the trust services available to the persons who need the service.

In addition to the exemptions identified in (a) of this section, the department may by regulation or order grant an exemption to a person if the person demonstrates good cause for needing the exemption and the department determines that the exemption would not conflict with public order or convenience.

In addition to any other requirements established for the exemption, to maintain an exemption under this section, a person who is exempt under (a) or (c) of this section may not offer fiduciary services to the general public.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002; am § 1 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 2 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

In 2016, “AS

13.26.580

” was substituted for “AS

13.26.320

” to reflect the renumbering of that section.

In 2018, in (a) of this section, “AS

45.56.360(c)

"” was substituted for “AS 45.56.445(c)” to reflect the 2018 renumbering of that section.

Cross references. —

For the effect of subsection (d) on Rules 7.2 and 7.3, Alaska Rules of Professional Conduct, see § 9(a), ch. 77, SLA 2002, in the 2002 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (a)(4), deleted “or investment advisory business activity” following “securities business activity”, substituted “an investment adviser” for “a state investment adviser” following “broker-dealer agent,”, inserted “investment” following “a federal covered”, substituted “AS 45.56.445(c)” for “AS 45.55.040(h)” following “notice filing under”, substituted “AS 45.56” for “AS 45.55” following “by the department under”, substituted “‘federal covered investment adviser,’ ‘investment adviser,’ ‘investment adviser representative,’ and ‘securities business’ have the meanings given in AS

45.56.900

” for “‘federal covered adviser,’ ‘investment adviser representative,’ ‘investment advisory business,’ ‘securities business,’ and ‘state investment adviser’ have the meanings given in AS

45.55.990

”.

Sec. 06.26.030.
Location of operation.

A trust company may act as a fiduciary in this state, another state, or a foreign country, subject to complying with applicable laws of the state or foreign country, at an office or branch established and maintained under this chapter.

A trust company may conduct any activities at an office outside this state that are permissible for a trust company chartered by the host state, except to the extent those activities are expressly prohibited by the laws of this state or by a regulation or order of the department applicable to the trust company.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)